Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202385-601
University of Nebraska or community college; interference with operation; faculty, administrative staff, student; dismissal or expulsion.

It shall be grounds for the dismissal of any member of the faculty or administrative staff employed by, or the expulsion of any student attending, the University of Nebraska or any community college in this state to use or assist others in any way in the use of force or to counsel, recommend, or urge the use of force or the threat of force or the seizure of property under the control of such institution, or by any act or action not sanctioned by law to prevent the faculty, administrative officers, employees, or students in such institution from engaging in their normal duties in connection with the operation of the institution or pursuing their studies at such institution.

Laws 1971, LB 445, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 112.